Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-604
State Treasurer and Auditor of Public Accounts; records; delivery to successors.

The Auditor of Public Accounts and the State Treasurer shall severally deliver over to their successors in office all books, papers, records, vouchers, presses and furniture appertaining thereto.

R.S.1866, c. 4, § 27, p. 27;

R.S.1913, § 5579;

C.S.1922, § 4883;

C.S.1929, § 84-604;

R.S.1943, § 84-604.

Official records are not conclusive against sureties. State v. Paxton, 65 Neb. 110, 90 N.W. 983 (1902).

Official records are competent and prima facie evidence against State Treasurer's sureties. Paxton v. State, 59 Neb. 460, 81 N.W. 383 (1899).